District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.74

Failure to return license or registration; penalty.

Any person willfully failing to return a license or registration as required in § 50-1301.70, or when otherwise requested in writing by the Mayor shall be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 or imprisoned not to exceed 30 days, or both.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 139, ch. 222, § 74
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279,§ 103(c), 54 DCR 903
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 266(a), 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-474.
1973 Ed., § 40-490.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-279 rewrote this section, which formerly read:
“Any person willfully failing to return license or registration as required in § 50-1301.70 shall be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned not to exceed 30 days, or both.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $500”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 266(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.